Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201181-3445
State and political subdivisions;
construction projects.

Except as otherwise provided in this
section and sections 81-3449 and 81-3453, the state and
its political subdivisions shall not engage in the construction of any public
works involving architecture or engineering unless the plans, specifications,
and estimates have been prepared and the construction has been observed by
an architect, a professional engineer, or a person under the direct supervision
of an architect, professional engineer, or those under the direct supervision
of an architect or professional engineer. This section shall not apply to
any public work in which the contemplated expenditure for the complete project
does not exceed one hundred thousand dollars.
The board shall adjust the dollar amount in this section every fifth year. The first such adjustment after August
27, 2011, shall be effective on July 1, 2014. The adjusted amount
shall be equal to the then current amount adjusted by the cumulative percentage
change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the
Federal Bureau of Labor Statistics for the five-year period preceding the
adjustment date. The amount shall be rounded to the next highest one-thousand-dollar
amount.

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 45;

Laws 1999, LB 253, § 2;

Laws 2004, LB 599, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB45, § 11.
August 27, 2011